Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Chapter 35. Offenses and Accidents.

Administrative Code. —

For motor vehicle and driving offenses: rules of the road, see 13 AAC 02.

Collateral references. —

Richard E. Erwin, Defense of Drunk Driving Cases: Criminal - Civil (Matthew Bender).

Campbell, Fisher, and Mansfield, Defense of Speeding, Reckless Driving & Vehicular Homicide (Matthew Bender).

Cohen and Green, Apprehending and Prosecuting the Drunk Driver: A Manual for Police and Prosecution (Matthew Bender).